New York, session 2025-2026, S1951.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 7 of section 11-104 of the 2 energy law, as added by section 1 of part RR of chapter 56 of the laws 3 of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 4 (b) In addition, in effectuating the provisions set forth in paragraph 5 (b) of subdivision six of this section the code shall include exemptions 6 for the purposes of allowing the installation and use of fossil-fuel 7 equipment and building systems where such are installed and used: 8 (i) for generation of emergency back-up power and standby power 9 systems; 10 (ii) in a manufactured home as defined in subdivision seven of section 11 six hundred one of the executive law; [or] 12 (iii) in a building or part of a building that is used as a manufac- 13 turing facility, commercial food establishment, laboratory, car wash, 14 laundromat, hospital, other medical facility, critical infrastructure, 15 including but not limited to emergency management facilities, wastewater 16 treatment facilities, and water treatment and pumping facilities, agri- 17 cultural building, fuel cell system, or crematorium, as such terms are 18 defined by the code council; or 19 (iv) in a building or part of a building that is owned or occupied by 20 a person who holds genuine and sincere religious beliefs and whose 21 health and safety will be jeopardized due to the prohibition of the 22 installation of fossil-fuel equipment and building systems because of 23 such genuine and sincere religious beliefs. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03479-01-5 S. 1951 2 1 § 2. Paragraph c of subdivision 19 of section 378 of the executive 2 law, as added by section 3 of part RR of chapter 56 of the laws of 2023, 3 is amended to read as follows: 4 c. In addition, in effectuating the provisions set forth in paragraph 5 a of this subdivision the code shall include exemptions for the purposes 6 of allowing the installation and use of fossil-fuel equipment and build- 7 ing systems where such systems are installed and used: 8 (i) for generation of emergency back-up power and standby power 9 systems; 10 (ii) in a manufactured home as defined in subdivision seven of section 11 six hundred one of [the executive law] this chapter; [or] 12 (iii) in a building or part of a building that is used as a manufac- 13 turing facility, commercial food establishment, laboratory, car wash, 14 laundromat, hospital, other medical facility, critical infrastructure, 15 including but not limited to emergency management facilities, wastewater 16 treatment facilities, and water treatment and pumping facilities, agri- 17 cultural building, fuel cell system, or crematorium, as such terms are 18 defined by the code council; or 19 (iv) in a building or part of a building that is owned or occupied by 20 a person who holds genuine and sincere religious beliefs and whose 21 health and safety will be jeopardized due to the prohibition of the 22 installation of fossil-fuel equipment and building systems because of 23 such genuine and sincere religious beliefs. 24 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.